Hawaii statutes.
§109-5 Security personnel, powers. The
person employed as the chief security officer by the authority shall have all
of the powers of police officers, including the power of arrest; provided that
the powers shall remain in force and in effect only while the person is in the
actual performance of the person's duties at the stadium. [L 1976, c 118, §1;
gen ch 1985; am L 1999, c 160, §10; am L 2016, c 61, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next